Illinois, session 104th, HB4115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.203 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.203)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-32)8    Sec. 2-3.203. Mental health screenings. 9    (a) On or before December 15, 2023, the State Board of 10Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 11Health Transformation Officer, Children's Behavioral Health 12Transformation Team, and the Office of the Governor, shall 13file a report with the Governor and the General Assembly that 14includes recommendations for implementation of mental health 15screenings in schools for students enrolled in kindergarten 16through grade 12. This report must include a landscape scan of 17current district-wide screenings, recommendations for 18screening tools, training for staff, and linkage and referral 19for identified students.20    (b) On or before October 1, 2024, the State Board of 21Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 22Health Transformation Team, the Office of the Governor, and 23relevant stakeholders as needed shall release a strategy that   HB4115- 2 -LRB104 15169 KTG 28313 b1includes a tool for measuring capacity and readiness to 2implement universal mental health screening of students. The 3strategy shall build upon existing efforts to understand 4district needs for resources, technology, training, and 5infrastructure supports. The strategy shall include a 6framework for supporting districts in a phased approach to 7implement universal mental health screenings. The State Board 8of Education shall issue a report to the Governor and the 9General Assembly on school district readiness and plan for 10phased approach to universal mental health screening of 11students on or before April 1, 2025. 12(Source: P.A. 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-885, eff. 8-9-24.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-32)15    Sec. 2-3.203. Mental health screenings. 16    (a) On or before December 15, 2023, the State Board of 17Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 18Health Transformation Team in the Office of the Governor, 19shall file a report with the Governor and the General Assembly 20that includes recommendations for implementation of mental 21health screenings in schools for students enrolled in 22kindergarten through grade 12. This report must include a 23landscape scan of current district-wide screenings, 24recommendations for screening tools, training for staff, and 25linkage and referral for identified students.  HB4115- 3 -LRB104 15169 KTG 28313 b1    (b) On or before October 1, 2024, the State Board of 2Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 3Health Transformation Team in the Office of the Governor, and 4relevant stakeholders as needed shall release a strategy that 5includes a tool for measuring capacity and readiness to 6implement universal mental health screening of students. The 7strategy shall build upon existing efforts to understand 8district needs for resources, technology, training, and 9infrastructure supports. The strategy shall include a 10framework for supporting districts in a phased approach to 11implement universal mental health screenings. The State Board 12of Education shall issue a report to the Governor and the 13General Assembly on school district readiness and plan for 14phased approach to universal mental health screening of 15students on or before April 1, 2025. 16    (c) On or before September 1, 2026, the State Board of 17Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 18Health Transformation Team in the Office of the Governor and 19relevant stakeholders, shall report its work and make 20available resource materials, including model procedures and 21guidance informed by a phased approach to implementing 22universal mental health screening in schools. These model 23school district procedures to facilitate the implementation of 24mental health screenings shall include, but are not limited 25to: (i) , the option to opt in; (ii) opt-out, confidentiality 26and privacy considerations; (iii) , communication with families   HB4115- 4 -LRB104 15169 KTG 28313 b1and communities about the use of mental health screenings, 2including a minimum of 3 written notifications each school 3year, one of which must be delivered by first-class mail, to a 4student's parent or guardian; (iv) , data sharing; , and (v) 5storage of mental health screening results and plans for 6follow-up and linkage to resources after screenings. Guidance 7shall include (1) mental health screening tools available for 8school districts to use with students and (2) associated 9training for school personnel. The State Board of Education 10shall make these resource materials available on its website. 11    (d) Mental health screenings shall be offered by school 12districts to students enrolled in grade 3 through grade 12, at 13least once a year, beginning with the 2027-2028 school year. A 14district may, by action of the State Board of Education, apply 15for an extension of the 2027-2028 school year implementation 16deadline if the school district meets criteria set by rule by 17the State Board of Education, which shall be based on the 18recommendations of the report issued in accordance with 19subsection (c). Notwithstanding the provisions of this 20subsection, the requirement to offer mental health screenings 21shall be in effect only for school years in which the State has 22successfully procured a screening tool that offers a 23self-report option for students and is made available to 24school districts at no cost. 25(Source: P.A. 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 26103-885, eff. 8-9-24; 104-32, eff. 1-1-26; revised 8-28-25.)   HB4115- 5 -LRB104 15169 KTG 28313 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2026.